Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 39. Mortgages, Deeds of Trust, and Other Liens

Editor’s note:

This article was numbered as article 9 of chapter 118, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1990, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1990, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor’s notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Law reviews:

For article, “The Statutory Right of Redemption from Foreclosures”, see 13

C

olo. Law. 793 (1984); for article, “Marshalling in Judicial or Nonjudicial Foreclosure in

C

olorado”, see 13 Colo. Law. 1809 (1984); for article, “Real Estate Potpourri -- Avoiding Sister State Anti-deficiency Laws”, see 14 Colo. Law. 775 (1985); for article, “Deeds in Lieu of Foreclosure”, see 15 Colo. Law. 394 (1986); for article, “The Agricultural Credit Act of 1987”, see 17 Colo. Law. 611 (1988); for article, “Foreclosure by Private Trustee: Now Is the Time for Colorado”, see 65 Den. U.L. Rev. 41 (1988); for article, “An Analysis of the Effect of S.B. 123 on Foreclosures”, see 17 Colo. Law. 845 (1988); for article, “Foreclosure of Deeds of Trust and Mortgages: 1990 Statutory Amendments -- Parts I and II”, see 19 Colo. Law. 1601 and 1843 (1990); for article, “Strategic Options for Overly Encumbered Real Property (Friendly Foreclosures)”, see 46 Colo. Law. 31 (July 2017).